Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.090

Aid granted without regard to applicant's race, creed, color, religion, sex, or ancestry.

All student financial aid shall be granted by the commission without regard to the applicant's race, creed, color, religion, sex, or ancestry.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 14. Formerly RCW 28B.10.812, 28.76.480.]